Tennessee, session 114, HB0584.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-1619(a), is amended by
deleting the language "until June 30, 2025" and substituting "until June 30, 2029".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0584
002445
- 1 -